California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(5) Industrial hygiene sampling methodology, including sampling techniques and recordkeeping.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1255, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7187.

When a building owner or operator contracts with an asbestos consultant or site surveillance technician for performance of the activities described in Sections 7181 and 7182, that asbestos consultant or site surveillance technician shall not have any financial or proprietary interest in an asbestos abatement contractor hired for the same project. However, this section shall not preclude the hiring of a consultant by a contractor for the purpose of providing health and safety services for the personnel of the contractor. This section shall not apply when a licensed contractor or registered asbestos abatement contractor takes no more than 12 bulk samples of suspected asbestos-containing material that is required to be removed, repaired, or disturbed as part of a construction project in a residential dwelling solely for any of the following purposes: (1) bid preparation for asbestos abatement; (2) evaluating exposure to its own employees during construction or asbestos abatement; or (3) determining for its own purposes or for the purpose of communicating whether or not a contract for asbestos abatement has been satisfactorily completed. Persons taking samples for the purposes described in this section shall be certified building inspectors under the Asbestos Hazard Emergency Response Act, as specified in Section 763 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations, appendix (c) to subpart (e). No licensed contractor or asbestos abatement contractor may provide professional health and safety services or perform any asbestos risk assessment. A licensed contractor or asbestos abatement contractor may seek compensation for bid preparation, including the cost of laboratory analysis of asbestos-containing material.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to make certain that the asbestos-related work performed by a consultant, including, but not limited to, clearance air monitoring, project design, and contract administration, is performed in a manner which provides for independent professional judgment undertaken without consideration of the financial or beneficial interest of the contractor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 526, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7189.

Any person who engages in the practices of an asbestos consultant or a site surveillance technician, who is not certified pursuant to this article, or who violates Section 7187, is subject to one of the following penalties:

(a) Conviction of a first offense is an infraction punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more than three thousand dollars ($3,000).

(b) Conviction of a subsequent offense is a misdemeanor requiring revocation or suspension of any asbestos consultant’s or site surveillance technician’s certification, and a fine not not less than three thousand dollars ($3,000) or more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year, or both the fine and imprisonment.

The division shall only impose these penalties after complying with all of the procedural requirements of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Division 3 of Part 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1255, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7189.5.

This article shall apply to asbestos abatement projects within the meaning of asbestos-related work as defined in Section 6501.8 of the Labor Code, and which involves 100 square feet or more of surface area of asbestos containing material.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1255, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7189.7.

(a) Nothing in this article shall be construed to require agencies of the state to contract with asbestos consultants or site surveillance technicians who are not employees of the state as long as employees of the state who are assigned to perform the activities described in Sections 7181 and 7182 have been certified by the division pursuant to the regulations required by subdivision (b) of Section 9021.5 of the Labor Code. Where feasible, the state shall assign a state civil service classification of associate industrial hygienist or senior industrial hygienist to carry out asbestos consultation activities as described in Section 7181 for state-owned and leased buildings. The individuals in the classification assigned shall be certified as required in this article before performing these activities.

(b) Nothing in this article shall be construed to require attorneys who provide legal advice on asbestos-related matters to building owners or operators to be certified by the division pursuant to the regulations required by subdivision (b) of Section 9021.5 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1255, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Prohibitions [7190. - 7191.]

7190.

(a) The name or position of a public official may not be used in an advertisement or any promotional material by a person licensed under this chapter, without the written authorization of the public official. A printed advertisement or promotional material that uses the name or position of a public official with that public official’s written authorization, shall also include a disclaimer in at least 10-point roman boldface type, that shall be in a color or print which contrasts with the background so as to be easily legible, and set apart from any other printed matter. The disclaimer shall consist of a statement that reads “The name of (specify name of public official) does not imply that (specify name of public official) endorses this product or service in (his or her) official capacity and does not imply an endorsement by any governmental entity.” If the advertisement is broadcast, this statement shall be read in a clearly audible tone of voice.

(b) For purposes of this section, “public official” means a member, officer, employee, or consultant of a local government agency, as defined in Section 82041 of the Government Code, or state agency, as defined in Section 82049 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1135, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7191.

(a) If a contract for work on residential property with four or fewer units contains a provision for arbitration of a dispute between the principals in the transaction, the provision shall be clearly titled “ARBITRATION OF DISPUTES.”

If a provision for arbitration is included in a printed contract, it shall be set out in at least 10-point roman boldface type or in contrasting red print in at least 8-point roman boldface type, and if the provision is included in a typed contract, it shall be set out in capital letters.

(b) Immediately before the line or space provided for the parties to indicate their assent or nonassent to the arbitration provision described in subdivision (a), and immediately following that arbitration provision, the following shall appear:

“NOTICE: BY INITIALING IN THE SPACE BELOW YOU ARE AGREEING TO HAVE ANY DISPUTE ARISING OUT OF THE MATTERS INCLUDED IN THE ‛ARBITRATION OF DISPUTES’ PROVISION DECIDED BY NEUTRAL ARBITRATION AS PROVIDED BY CALIFORNIA LAW AND YOU ARE GIVING UP ANY RIGHTS YOU MIGHT POSSESS TO HAVE THE DISPUTE LITIGATED IN A COURT OR JURY TRIAL. BY INITIALING IN THE SPACE BELOW YOU ARE GIVING UP YOUR JUDICIAL RIGHTS TO DISCOVERY AND APPEAL, UNLESS THOSE RIGHTS ARE SPECIFICALLY INCLUDED IN THE ‛ARBITRATION OF DISPUTES’ PROVISION. IF YOU REFUSE TO SUBMIT TO ARBITRATION AFTER AGREEING TO THIS PROVISION, YOU MAY BE COMPELLED TO ARBITRATE UNDER THE AUTHORITY OF THE BUSINESS AND PROFESSIONS CODE OR OTHER APPLICABLE LAWS. YOUR AGREEMENT TO THIS ARBITRATION PROVISION IS VOLUNTARY.” “WE HAVE READ AND UNDERSTAND THE FOREGOING AND AGREE TO SUBMIT DISPUTES ARISING OUT OF THE MATTERS INCLUDED IN THE ‛ARBITRATION OF DISPUTES’ PROVISION TO NEUTRAL ARBITRATION.”

If the above provision is included in a printed contract, it shall be set out either in at least 10-point roman boldface type or in contrasting red print in at least 8-point roman boldface type, and if the provision is included in a typed contract, it shall be set out in capital letters.

(c) A provision for arbitration of a dispute between a principal in a contract for work on a residential property with four or fewer units that does not comply with this section may not be enforceable against any person other than the licensee.

(d) This section does not limit the board’s authority to investigate complaints or to discipline a licensee for violations of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1135, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9.3. Home Inspectors [7195. - 7199.]

7195.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) (1) “Home inspection” is a noninvasive, physical examination, performed for a fee in connection with a transfer, as defined in subdivision (e), of real property, of the mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems or the structural and essential components of a residential dwelling of one to four units designed to identify material defects in those systems, structures, and components. “Home inspection” includes any consultation regarding the property that is represented to be a home inspection or any confusingly similar term.

(2) In connection with the transfer, as defined in subdivision (e), of real property with a swimming pool or spa,
 an appropriate inspection shall include a noninvasive physical examination of the pool or spa and dwelling for the purpose of identifying which, if any, of the seven drowning prevention safety features listed in subdivision (a) of Section 115922 of the Health and Safety Code the pool or spa is equipped, in good repair, operable as designed, and, if applicable, appropriately labeled, as required by Section 115922 of the Health and Safety Code. This paragraph does not require a determination as to whether a pool safety feature meets the ASTM International and American Society of Mechanical Engineers specifications referenced in Section 115922 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “Home inspection,” if requested by the client, may include an inspection of energy efficiency. Energy efficiency items to be inspected may include the following:

(A) A noninvasive inspection of insulation
 R-values in attics, roofs, walls, floors, and ducts.

(B) The number of window glass panes and frame types.

(C) The heating and cooling equipment and water heating systems.

(D) The age and fuel type of major appliances.

(E) The exhaust and cooling fans.

(F) The type of thermostat and other systems.

(G) The general integrity and potential leakage areas of walls, window areas, doors, and duct systems.

(H) The solar control efficiency of existing windows.

(b) A “material defect” is a condition that
 significantly affects the value, desirability, habitability, or safety of the dwelling. Style or aesthetics shall not be considered in determining whether a system, structure, or component is defective.

(c) A “home inspection report” is a written report prepared for a fee and issued after a home inspection. The report clearly describes and identifies the inspected systems, structures, or components of the dwelling, any material defects identified, and any recommendations regarding the conditions observed or recommendations for evaluation by appropriate persons. In a dwelling with a pool or spa, the report shall identify which, if any, of the seven drowning prevention safety features listed in subdivision (a) of Section 115922 of the Health and Safety Code the pool or spa is equipped with and shall specifically state if the pool or spa has fewer than two of the listed drowning prevention safety features, and whether those features are in place,
 in good repair, operable as designed, and, if applicable, appropriately labeled, as required by Section 115922 of the Health and Safety Code. The report shall also include a written statement that a pool isolation fence, as described in Section 115923 of the Health and Safety Code, is the most studied and effective drowning prevention safety feature for preventing a child from accessing a pool or spa unsupervised, according to the American Academy of Pediatrics Policy Statement, “Prevention of Drowning,” published in 2019. This subdivision does not require a determination as to whether a pool safety feature meets the ASTM International and American Society of Mechanical Engineers specifications referenced in Section 115922 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) A “home inspector” is any individual who performs a home inspection.

(e) “Transfer” is a transfer by sale, exchange,
 installment land sales contract, as defined in Section 2985 of the Civil Code, lease with an option to purchase, any other option to purchase, or ground lease coupled with improvements, of real property or residential stock cooperative, improved with or consisting of not less than one nor more than four dwelling units.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 769, Sec. 2.   (SB 552)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7195.5.

(a) For purposes of improving landscape water use and irrigation efficiency, a home inspection report on a dwelling unit prepared pursuant to this chapter on a parcel containing an in-ground landscape irrigation system, the operation of which is under the exclusive control of the owner or occupant of the dwelling, may include an irrigation system inspection report, prepared by either a home inspector or certified landscape irrigation auditor, that contains all of the following:

(1) Examination of the irrigation system controller, if present, noting observable defects in installation or operation, or both.

(2) Activation of
 each zone or circuit providing irrigation water to turf grass, noting malfunctions observed in the operation of each of the following:

(A) The irrigation valve.

(B) Visible irrigation supply piping.

(C) Sprinkler heads and stems.

(3) During activation of the system pursuant to paragraph (2), observation of any of the following during the period of operation, in minutes, specified in the report:

(A) Irrigation spray being directed to hardscape.

(B) Irrigation water leaving the irrigated area as surface runoff.

(C) Ponding of irrigation water on the surface of the irrigated area.

(4) Notation whether inspection is limited due to snow, ice, or other site conditions that impede an inspection.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a sanction or penalty regarding prohibited hours, days, or effects of operation of a landscape irrigation system shall not be levied upon either the home inspector, the landscape irrigation auditor, the occupant, or the owner of a property by any state or local agency or water purveyor as a consequence of the operation of a landscape irrigation system for the purpose of an irrigation system inspection carried out under this section.

(c) A home inspector is encouraged to provide information or access to information regarding water-efficient landscape irrigation systems within the home inspection report.

(d) To the extent funds are available, the Department of Water Resources, in consultation with the California Real Estate Inspection Association and the Department of Housing and Community Development, shall compile an estimate of the number of properties for which an irrigation system inspection report has been prepared each year, beginning with 2018, for inclusion in an update to the California Water Plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 867, Sec. 3.   (AB 2371)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7195.7.

A home inspector shall not give an opinion of valuation on a property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 267, Sec. 1.   (AB 1018)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7196.

It is the duty of a home inspector who is not licensed as a general contractor, structural pest control operator, or architect, or registered as a professional engineer to conduct a home inspection with the degree of care that a reasonably prudent home inspector would exercise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 338, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7196.1.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to allow home inspectors who are not registered engineers to perform any analysis of the systems, components, or structural integrity of a dwelling that would constitute the practice of civil, electrical, or mechanical engineering, or to exempt a home inspector from Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700), Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000), Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 8500) of Division 3, or Part 3 (commencing with Section 11300) of Division 4.

(b) This chapter does not apply to a registered engineer, licensed land surveyor, or licensed
 architect acting pursuant to
 their professional registration or license, nor does it affect the obligations of a real estate licensee or transferor under Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1102) of Chapter 2 of Title 4 of Part 3 of Division 2 of, or Article 2 (commencing with Section 2079) of Chapter 3 of Title 6 of Part 4 of Division 3 of, the Civil Code.

(c) Except as required to comply with standards set forth in law or regulation, a real estate appraiser licensed under Part 3 (commencing with Section 11300) of Division 4, performing a real estate appraisal, shall not engage in the activity of a home inspector performing a
 home
 inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 267, Sec. 2.   (AB 1018)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7196.2.

(a) If a home inspector observes any shade of yellow corrugated stainless steel tubing during a home inspection, the home inspector shall include that observation, and the following notification, in the home inspection report: 
“Manufacturers of yellow corrugated stainless steel tubing believe that yellow corrugated stainless steel tubing is safer if properly bonded and grounded as required by the manufacturer’s installation instructions. Proper bonding and grounding of this product can only be determined by a licensed electrical contractor.”
(b) For purposes of this section, “corrugated stainless steel tubing” means a flexible, stainless steel pipe used to supply natural gas and propane in
 residential, commercial, and industrial structures. 

(c) The degree of care specified in Section 7196 shall be used in determining whether a home inspector has complied with the requirements of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 225, Sec. 2.   (SB 988)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7197.

(a) It is an unfair business practice for a home inspector, a company that employs the inspector, or a company that is controlled by a company that also has a financial interest in a company employing a home inspector, to do any of the following:

(1) To perform or offer to perform, for an additional fee, any repairs to a structure on which the inspector, or the inspector’s company, has prepared a home inspection report in the past 12 months.

(2) Inspect for a fee any property in which the inspector, or the inspector’s company, has any financial interest or any interest in the transfer of the property.

(3) To offer or deliver any compensation, inducement, or reward to the owner of the inspected property, the broker, or agent, for the referral of any business to the inspector or the inspection company.

(4) Accept an engagement to make an inspection or to prepare a report in which the employment itself or the fee payable for the inspection is contingent upon the conclusions in the report, preestablished findings, or the close of escrow.

(b) A home protection company that is affiliated with or that retains the home inspector does not violate this section if it performs repairs pursuant to claims made under the home protection contract.

(c) This section
 shall not affect the ability of a structural pest control operator to perform repairs pursuant to Section 8505 as a result of a structural pest control inspection.

(d) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not affect the ability of a roofing contractor who holds a C-39 license, as defined in Section 832.39 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations, to perform repairs pursuant to the contractor’s inspection of a roof for the specific purpose of providing a roof certification if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) Different employees perform the home inspection and the roof inspection.

(2) The roof inspection is ordered prior to, or at the same time as, the home inspection, or the roof inspection is
 completed before the commencement of the home inspection.

(3) The consumer is provided a consumer disclosure before the consumer authorizes the home inspection that includes all of the following:

(A) The same company that performs the roof inspection and roof repairs will perform the home inspection on the same property.

(B) Any repairs that are authorized by the consumer are for the repairs identified in the roofing contractor’s roof inspection report and no repairs identified in the home inspection are authorized or allowed as specified in the roof inspection.

(C) The consumer has the right to seek a second opinion.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “roof certification” means a written statement by a licensed C-39 Roofing Contractor who has performed a roof inspection, made any necessary repairs, and warrants that the roof is free of leaks at the time that the certification is issued and should perform as designed for the specified term of the certification.

(e) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not affect the ability of a plumbing contractor who holds a C-36 license, as defined in Section 832.36 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations, to perform repairs pursuant to the inspection of a sewer lateral pipe connecting a residence or business to a
 sewer system if the consumer is provided a consumer disclosure before the consumer authorizes the home inspection that includes all of the following notifications:

(1) The same company that performs the sewer lateral inspection and the sewer lateral repairs will perform the home inspection on the same property.

(2) Any repairs that are authorized by the consumer are for the repairs identified in the sewer lateral inspection report and no repairs identified in the home inspection
 report are authorized or allowed except as specified in the sewer lateral inspection report.

(3) The consumer has the right to seek a second
 opinion on the sewer lateral inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 545, Sec. 1.   (SB 484)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7198.

Contractual provisions that purport to waive the duty owed pursuant to Section 7196, or limit the liability of the home inspector to the cost of the home inspection report, are contrary to public policy and invalid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 338, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7199.

The time for commencement of a legal action for breach of duty arising from a home inspection report shall not exceed four years from the date of the inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 338, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9.4. Home Energy Rating System (HERS) Home Inspections [7199.5. - 7199.7.]

7199.5.

(a) All home inspections, including those defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 7195, may, if requested by the client, be accompanied by a Home Energy Rating System (HERS) California home energy audit pursuant to regulations adopted by the Energy Commission in compliance with Section 25942 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) If the client requests a HERS California home energy audit, the HERS California home inspection report accompanying any home inspection report defined in subdivision (c) of Section 7195 shall comply with the standards and requirements established by the Energy Commission for HERS California home energy audits as specified in Article 8 (commencing with Section 1670)
 of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 20 of the California Code of Regulations, implementing the California Home Energy Rating System Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 453, Sec. 1.   (AB 1809)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7199.7.

It is the intent of the Legislature that a Home Energy Rating System (HERS) California home energy audit may, at the request of the client, be performed by a home inspector who meets the requirements of Article 8 (commencing with Section 1670) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 20 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 453, Sec. 1.   (AB 1809)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9.5. Guide Dogs for the Blind [7200. - 7202.]

7200.

Any person who uses in any sign, business card, or letterhead, or in any advertisement, the words “guide dog instructor,” “certified guide dog instructor,” or any other terms or letters indicating or implying that he or she is an instructor trained in the utilization or training of guide dogs for the blind, or who represents or holds himself or herself out as a guide dog instructor, without having knowledge of the special problems of persons who are blind or visually impaired and being able to teach them, being able to demonstrate the ability to train guide dogs with which persons who are blind or visually impaired would be safe under various traffic conditions, or being employed by a guide dog school certified by the International Guide Dog Federation,
 or a successor entity, is subject to a fine or civil penalty.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 669, Sec. 5.   (AB 1705)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7201.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Guide dog instructor” means a person who instructs or trains persons who are blind or visually impaired in the use of guide dogs or who engages in the business of training, selling, hiring, or supplying guide dogs for persons who are blind or visually impaired.

(b) “Guide dog” means a dog that has been trained or is being trained to assist blind or visually impaired individuals. For purposes of this chapter, “guide dog” is used to describe a “service dog.”

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 669, Sec. 5.   (AB 1705)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7202.

A guide dog school shall submit to the Department of Consumer Affairs on or before September 1 of each year a list of all trainers or guide dog instructors employed or contracted by the school. The department shall not charge a fee for the collection of this data.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 669, Sec. 5.   (AB 1705)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Barbering and Cosmetology [7301. - 7426.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [7301. - 7315.]

7301.

This chapter constitutes the chapter on hair, skin, nail care, and electrolysis and may be known and cited as the Barbering and Cosmetology Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1148, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7302.

The following definitions shall apply for purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Department” means the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(b) “Director” means the Director of Consumer Affairs.

(c) “Board” or “bureau” means the State Board of Barbering and Cosmetology.

(d) “Executive officer” means the executive officer
 of the State Board of Barbering and Cosmetology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7303.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 8 (commencing with Section 9148) of Chapter 1.5 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 2 of the Government Code, there is in the Department of Consumer Affairs the State Board of Barbering and Cosmetology in which the administration of this chapter is vested.

(b) (1) The board shall consist of 13 members. Seven members shall be public members, and six members shall represent the professions.

(2) The Governor shall appoint five of the public members and the six professional members. The six professional members shall be comprised as follows:

(A) A cosmetologist.

(B) A barber.

(C) An esthetician.

(D) An electrologist.

(E) A manicurist.

(F) An establishment owner.

(3) The Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint one public member.

 (4) Members of the board shall be appointed for a term of four years, except that of the members appointed by the Governor, two of the public members and two of the professions members shall be appointed for an initial term of two years. No board member may serve longer than two consecutive terms.

(5) Each member of the board shall receive a per diem pursuant to Section 103.

(c) The board may appoint an executive officer who is exempt from civil service. The executive officer shall exercise the powers and perform the duties delegated by the board and vested in the executive officer by this chapter. The appointment of the executive officer is subject to the approval of the director. In the event that a newly authorized board replaces an existing or previous bureau, the director may appoint an interim executive officer for the board who shall serve temporarily until the new board appoints a permanent executive officer.

(d) The executive officer shall provide examiners, inspectors, and other personnel necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(e) This section shall remain
 in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed. Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of this section renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 648, Sec. 2.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7303.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Board of Barbering and Cosmetology in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7305.

The board shall elect officers annually from among its members, each of whom shall hold office for a term of one year. An officer shall not serve in a particular officer position for more than two terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 253, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7309.

The board shall establish a principal office, and may establish branch offices and examination facilities in the state as may be deemed necessary for the board to conduct its business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7311.

The board shall adopt and use a common seal for the authentication of the board’s records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1148, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7312.

(a) The board shall do all of the following:

(1) Make rules and regulations in aid or furtherance of this chapter in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

(2) Conduct and administer examinations of applicants for licensure.

(3) Issue licenses to those applicants that may be entitled thereto.

(4) Discipline persons who have been determined to be in violation of this chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(5) Adopt rules governing sanitary conditions and precautions to be employed as are reasonably necessary to protect the public health and safety in establishments, schools approved by the board, and in the practice of any profession provided for in this chapter. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Title 2 of the Government Code, and shall be submitted to the State Department of Public Health and approved by that department prior to filing with the Secretary of State. A written copy of all those rules shall be furnished to each licensee.

(6) Offer and make
 available all written materials provided to licensees and applicants in English, Korean, Spanish, and Vietnamese.

(b) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 409, Sec. 1.   (AB 2025)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Amended version operative July 1, 2017, pursuant to earlier operation of new subdivision (b).)
-------------------------------------------

7313.

(a) (1) To ensure compliance with the laws and regulations of this chapter, the board’s executive officer and authorized representatives shall, except as provided by Section 159.5, have access to, and shall inspect, any establishment or mobile unit during business hours or at any time in which barbering, cosmetology, or electrolysis are being performed. It is the intent of the Legislature that inspections be conducted on Saturdays and Sundays as well as weekdays, if collective bargaining agreements and civil service provisions permit.

(2) The board shall maintain a program of random and targeted inspections of establishments to ensure compliance with applicable laws relating to the public health and safety and the conduct and operation of
 establishments. The board or its authorized representatives shall inspect establishments to reasonably determine compliance levels and to identify market conditions that require targeted enforcement.

(b) To ensure compliance with health and safety requirements adopted by the board, the executive officer and authorized representatives shall, except as provided in Section 159.5, have access to, and shall inspect the premises of, all schools in which the practice of barbering, cosmetology, or electrolysis is performed on the public. Notices of violation shall be issued to schools for violations of regulations governing conditions related to the health and safety of patrons. Each notice shall specify the section violated and a timespan within which the violation must be corrected. A copy of the notice of violation shall be provided to the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education.

(c) With prior written authorization from the board or its executive officer, any member of the board may enter and visit, in their capacity as a board member, any establishment, during business hours or at any time when barbering, cosmetology, or electrolysis is being performed. The visitation by a board member shall be for the purpose of conducting official board business, but shall not be used as a basis for any licensing disciplinary action by the board.

(d) The board shall adopt a protocol for inspecting establishments when an inspector has difficulty understanding or communicating with the owner, manager, or employees of the establishment due to language barriers. The board shall evaluate the protocol every two years to ensure the protocol remains current.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 648, Sec. 4.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7314.

(a) The board shall keep a record of its proceedings relating to its public meetings, meetings of committees, and records relating to the issuance, refusal, renewal, suspension, and revocation of licenses.

(b) The board shall keep a registration record of each licensee containing the name, address, license number, and date issued. This record shall also contain any facts that the applicants may have stated in their application for examination for licensure. The board shall collect, through optional questions on a written application for a license and in an electronic application to renew a license issued pursuant to this chapter, the spoken and
 written language preference of each applicant.

(c) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this
 subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 409, Sec. 2.   (AB 2025)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Amended version operative July 1, 2017, pursuant to earlier operation of new subdivision (c).)
-------------------------------------------

7314.3.

(a) The board shall establish a Health and Safety Advisory Committee to provide the board with advice and recommendations on health and safety issues before the board that impact licensees, including how to ensure licensees are aware of basic labor laws and how to ensure licensees have awareness about physical and sexual abuse their clients may be experiencing.

(b) For purposes of this section, basic labor laws include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Key differences between the legal rights, benefits, and obligations of an employee and an independent contractor.

(2) Wage and hour rights of an hourly employee.

(3) Antidiscrimination laws relating to the use of a particular language in the workplace.

(4) Antiretaliation laws relating to a worker’s right to file complaints with the Department of Industrial Relations.

(5) How to obtain more information about state and federal labor laws.

(c) For purposes of this section, physical and sexual abuse includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Domestic violence.

(2) Sexual assault.

(3) Human trafficking.

(4) Elder abuse.

(d) Members of the committee shall receive a per diem pursuant to Section 103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 648, Sec. 5.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7314.5.

(a) The board may promote awareness of physical and sexual abuse by means of mail, television, radio, motion picture, newspaper, book, Internet, or other electronic communication.

(b) For purposes of this
 section, physical and sexual abuse includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Domestic violence.

(2) Sexual assault.

(3) Human trafficking.

(4) Elder abuse.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 312, Sec. 3.   (AB 326)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7315.

A majority of the board may, in any meeting properly noticed in accordance with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act, exercise all the duties and powers devolving upon the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1672.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Application of Chapter [7316. - 7320.5.]

7316.

(a) The practice of barbering is all or any combination of the following practices:

(1) Shaving or trimming the beard or cutting the hair.

(2) Giving facial and scalp massages or treatments with oils, creams, lotions, or other preparations either by hand or mechanical appliances.
